Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5225
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Small Employer Health Insurance Availability Act,
the definitions found in sections 44-5226 to 44-5255.01 shall be used.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 31;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 34;

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 30;

Laws 2009, LB192, § 6.